Utah statutes.
4-39-205.   License renewal.

(1)  To renew a license, the licensee shall submit to the department:

(a)  an inspection certificate showing that:

(i)  the domesticated elk, on the domesticated elk facility, have been inspected and certified by the department for health, proof of ownership, and genetic purity; and

(ii)  the facility has been properly maintained as provided in this chapter during the immediately preceding 60-day period; and

(b)  a record of each purchase of domesticated elk and transfer of domesticated elk into the facility, which shall include the following information:

(i)  name, address, and health approval number of the source;

(ii)  date of transaction; and

(iii)  number and sex.

(2) (a)  If the application for renewal is not received on or before April 30, a late fee will be charged.

(b)  A license may not be renewed until the fee is paid.

(3)  If the application and fee for renewal are not received on or before July 1, the license may not be renewed, and a new license shall be required.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

